Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 8

Dissolution

61-2-801. When required — Exception.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the first to occur of the following:

At the time or upon the happening of events specified in the partnership agreement;

Written consent of all partners;

In the event of withdrawal of a general partner, unless at the time there is at least one (1) other general partner and the partnership agreement permits the business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general partner and that partner does so, but the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of any event of withdrawal if, within ninety (90) days after the withdrawal, all partners agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment, effective as of the date of withdrawal, of one (1) or more additional general partners if necessary or desired; or

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under § 61-2-802.

Upon dissolution of the limited partnership, a certificate of cancellation must be filed pursuant to § 61-2-203.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 63, 64.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-802. Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner, the court of record may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-803. Winding up.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners or a person approved by the limited partners or, if there is more than one (1) class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate, may wind up the limited partnership's affairs, but the court of record, upon cause shown, may wind up the limited partnership's affairs upon application of any partner, his legal representative or assignee, and in connection therewith, may appoint a liquidating trustee.

Upon dissolution of a limited partnership and until the filing of a certificate of cancellation as provided in § 61-2-203, the persons winding up the limited partnership's affairs may, in the name of and for and on behalf of the limited partnership, prosecute and defend suits, whether civil, criminal or administrative, settle in a reasonable manner and close the limited partnership's business, dispose of and convey the limited partnership's property, discharge or make reasonable provision for the limited partnership's liabilities, and distribute to the partners any remaining assets of the limited partnership, all without affecting the liability of limited partners and without imposing the liability of a general partner or a liquidating trustee.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 65, 66.

61-2-804. Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership (whether by payment or the making of reasonable provisions for payment thereof) other than liabilities for which reasonable provision for payment has been made and liabilities for distributions to partners under § 61-2-601 or § 61-2-604;

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under § 61-2-601 or § 61-2-604; and

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions, and second respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

A limited partnership which has dissolved shall pay or make reasonable provision to pay all claims and obligations, including all contingent, conditional or unmatured claims and obligations, known to the limited partnership and all claims and obligations which are known to the limited partnership but for which the identity of the claimant is unknown. If there are sufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid in full and any such provision for payment made shall be made in full. If there are insufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid or provided for according to their priority and, among claims and obligations of equal priority, ratably to the extent of assets available therefor. Unless otherwise provided in a partnership agreement, any remaining assets shall be distributed as provided in this chapter. Any liquidating trustee winding up a limited partnership's affairs who has complied with this section shall not be personally liable to the claimants of the dissolved limited partnership by reason of such person's actions in winding up the limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 67-69.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-805. Known claims against dissolved limited partnership — Notice of dissolution.

A dissolved limited partnership may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved limited partnership shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted:

The amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date; and

Any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than four (4) months from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved limited partnership must receive the claim; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written notice of the claim is not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved limited partnership is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection (b) and the claimant does not deliver a written notice of the claim to the dissolved limited partnership by the deadline; or

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant that his claim is rejected, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within three (3) months from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

For purposes of this section, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed thereon;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Twenty (20) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark if mailed correctly addressed, and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

Acts 1989, ch. 270, § 70.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-901 — 6-903.

61-2-806. Unknown claims against dissolved limited partnership — Notice — Limitations.

A dissolved limited partnership may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the limited partnership present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved limited partnership's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the limited partnership will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved limited partnership publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited partnership within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under § 61-2-805;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved limited partnership but not acted on;

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a limited partner of the dissolved limited partnership to the extent of his pro rata share of the claim or the limited partnership assets distributed to him in liquidation, whichever is less, but a limited partner's total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to him.

Acts 1989, ch. 270, § 71.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-904.